apertium-olo.olo.lexc
LEXICON A_OZA !!= @CODE@ oza:oza
:%{back%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_SÄYNÄ !!= @CODE@ säynä:säynä
:%{front%} NMN_OZA/SÄYNÄ ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_KALA !!= @CODE@ kala:kala
:%{back%} NMN_KALA ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_KOIVU !!= @CODE@ koivu:koivu
:%{back%}        NMN_KOIVU/HERY ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_HERY !!= @CODE@ hery:hery
:%{front%}        NMN_KOIVU/HERY ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_LUGU !!= @CODE@ lugu:lugu
:%{back%}        NMN_LUGU/IDY ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^WGStem%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_IDY !!= @CODE@ idy:idy
:%{front%}        NMN_LUGU/IDY ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}%^WGStem%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_RUNO
:%{back%}	NMN_RUNO/HÖRÖ ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_RUADO
:%{back%}	NMN_RUADO/KYNDÖ ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_PAPPI !!= @CODE@ pappi:pappi
:%{back%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI ;

LEXICON A_HÄKKI !!= @CODE@ häkki:häkki
:%{front%} NMN_PAPPI/HÄKKI ;

LEXICON A_ARTELI !!= @CODE@ 
:%{back%}     NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI ;
LEXICON A_LEIRI !!= @CODE@ 
:%{front%}     NMN_ARTELI/LEIRI ;

LEXICON A_ALUS !!= @CODE@ alus:aluks
:%{back%} NMN_ALUS/ILVES   ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}e%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_SUALIŠ !!= @CODE@ suališ:suali
:%{back%}	 NMN_SUALIŠ ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_KUURNIS !!= @CODE@ kuurnis:kuurne
:%{back%}      NMN_KUURNIS ;

LEXICON A_PUHTAHUS !!= @CODE@ puhtahus:puhtahu
:%{back%}	NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS ;
LEXICON A_VÄHYS !!= @CODE@ vähys:vähy
:%{front%}	NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS ;

LEXICON A_OLUT !!= @CODE@ olut:olu
:%{back%}	 NMN_OLUT ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEM WITH UNIQUE %<nom%>%<sg%> VOWEL
LEXICON A_PÄIVY !!= @CODE@ päivy:päivä
:%{front%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_MUARJU !!= @CODE@ muarju:muarja
:%{back%}	NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_PIÄSTÄNDY !!= @CODE@ piäständy:piäständä
:%{front%}	NMN_MUARJU/PIÄSTÄNDY ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_AKKU !!= @CODE@ akku:akka
:%{back%}	NMN_AKKU ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_KOIRU
:%{back%} NMN_KOIRU/PÄIVY ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^E1%>mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}%^RmVow%>i NMN_ENIN        ;


LEXICON A_VALGEI !!= @CODE@ valgei:valge
:%{back%} NMN_VALGEI/LIBEI        ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%>emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}vi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_RAHMANNOI !!= @CODE@ rahmannoi:rahmannoi
:%{back%} NMN_RAHMANNOI        ;


LEXICON A_HARDIE
:%{back%} NMN_HARDIE	;

LEXICON A_OSTAI
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_OSTAI ;

LEXICON A_PAGIZII !!= @CODE@ pagizii:pagizi
:%{back%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PAGIZII ;

LEXICON A_PEZII
:%{front%}%>%{ijPRC%} NMN_PEZII ;

LEXICON A_KONDII
:%{back%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;
LEXICON A_STIPENDII
:%{front%} NMN_KONDII/STIPENDII ;

LEXICON A_KESTÄY !!= @CODE@ kestäy:kestä
:%{front%} NMN_KESTÄY ;

!! !TWO-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS WITH CONSONANT-FINAL PARTITIVE STEM


!! !THREE-SYLLABLE VOWEL-FINAL STEMS
LEXICON A_PAREMBI !!= @CODE@ parembi:paremb
:%{back%} NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI	  ;
+Der/MWN:%{back%} N_PAREMBI ;
!%<n%>:%{aä%} Adj-NB-i ; !2012-09-27 unknown -loi vs -i

LEXICON A_JIÄTÖI !!= @CODE@ jiätöi:jiät
:%{front%} A_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI ;
LEXICON A_HUOLETOI !!= @CODE@ huoletoi:huolet
:%{back%} A_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI ;
LEXICON A_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI !!= @CODE@ huoletoi:huolet
%<n%>:t%{oö%}m%{uy%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS ;
:	NMN_HUOLETOI/JIÄTÖI   ;
+Der/MWN: N_HUOLETOI ; 
+Der/MWN%<n%>:t%{oö%}m%{aä%} Adj-NB-i ; !2012-09-27 unknown -loi vs -i
%<com%>p:t%{oö%}memb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:t%{oö%}mi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_KARJALAINE !!= @CODE@ karjalaine:karjala
:%{back%}z%{uy%} N_PUHTAHUS ;
:%{back%}	NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE	 ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}zemb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}zi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_LIYGILÄINE !!= @CODE@ liygiläine:liygilä
:%{front%}z%{uy%} N_PUHTAHUS ;
:%{front%}	NMN_KARJALAINE/LIYGILÄINE ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}zemb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}zi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_NAINE !!= @CODE@ naine:nai
:%{back%} A_NAINE/KIELINE_01 ;
LEXICON A_KIELINE !!= @CODE@ kieline:kieli
:%{front%} A_NAINE/KIELINE_01 ;
LEXICON A_NAINE/KIELINE_01 !!= @CODE@ kieline:kieli naine:nai
%<n%>:z%{uy%} NMN_PUHTAHUS/VÄHYS ;
: NMN_NAINE/KIELINE ;
%<com%>p:zemb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:zi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_TOINE !!= @CODE@ toine:to
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}izemb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}izi NMN_ENIN        ;
LEXICON A_TOINE-PL !!= @CODE@ toine:to
:%{back%} NMN_TOINE-PL ;

!! !THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH TWO-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULAR
LEXICON A_KARJAL !!= @CODE@ karjal:karjal
:%{back%}     NMN_KARJAL ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_MADAL !!= @CODE@ madal:madal
:%{back%}%{uy%} N_PUHTAHUS ;
:%{back%}	NMN_MADAL ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_PIIRAI !!= @CODE@ piirai:piira 
:%{back%}	NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI   ;
LEXICON A_VERÄI !!= @CODE@ veräi:verä 
:%{front%}	NMN_PIIRAI/VERÄI   ;

LEXICON A_RAIŠ !!= @CODE@ raiš:ra
:%{back%}     NMN_RAIŠ   ;

LEXICON A_TOVESTEH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
:%{back%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH	;

LEXICON A_PEREH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
:%{front%}	NMN_TOVESTEH/PEREH	;

LEXICON A_TULLUH !!= @CODE@ tulluh:tullu
!!= * Yaml: __A-tulluh__
:%{back%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH ;

LEXICON A_PESSYH !!= @CODE@ pessyh:pessy
:%{front%} NMN_TULLUH/PESSYH ;

LEXICON A_ARMAS !!= @CODE@ armas:arma
:%{back%} NMN_ARMAS/EVAES        ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}h%{aä%}mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}hi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_VARVAS !!= @CODE@ varvas:varva
:%{back%} NMN_VARVAS        ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}h%{aä%}mb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}hi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_TUORES !!= @CODE@ tuores:tuore
!!= * Yaml: __A-tuores__
:%{back%} NMN_TUORES ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}hemb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}hi NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_SUURIM !!= @CODE@ suurim:suurim
:%{back%}	NMN_SUURIM ;

LEXICON A_SUARI !!= @CODE@ suari:suar
:%{back%} A_SUARI/KIELI_01 ;

LEXICON A_KIELI !!= @CODE@ kieli:kiel
:%{front%} A_SUARI/KIELI_01 ;
LEXICON A_SUARI/KIELI_01 !!= @CODE@ suari:suar
:	NMN_SUARI/KIELI	;
%<com%>p:emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_VUOZI !!= @CODE@ vuozi:vuod
:%{back%}	NMN_VUOZI/VEZI ;
%<com%>p:%{back%}%^WGStem%>emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{back%}%^WGStem%>i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON A_VEZI !!= @CODE@ vezi:ved
:%{front%}     NMN_VUOZI/VEZI ;

LEXICON A_NIMI !!= @CODE@ nimi:nim
:%{front%}        NMN_HANGI/NIMI  ;
%<com%>p:%{front%}emb NMN_PAREMBI/ENÄMBI        ;
+Der/in%<sup%>erl:%{front%}i NMN_ENIN        ;

LEXICON adjectives
alembi%<adj%>:alemb A_PAREMBI  "alempi" ;
bohattu%<adj%>:bohatta A_AKKU  "rikas" ;
hurai%<adj%>:hura A_PIIRAI  "vasen" ;
hämär%<adj%>:hämärä A_KALA  "hämärä" ;
imely%<adj%>:imelä A_PÄIVY  "äitelä" ;
jiännös%<adj%>:jiännökse A_ALUS  "loppu-" ;
kalie%<adj%>:kalie A_HARDIE  "kolea" ;
kauniš%<adj%>:kaune A_RAIŠ  "kaunis" ;
keksevä%<adj%>:keksevä A_OZA  "kekseliäs" ;
kelduruspakko%<adj%>:keldu#ruspakko A_RUADO  "kellanpunainen" ;
kezi%<adj%>:kezi A_NIMI  "(eläimestä:) kesy" ;
kirakko%<adj%>:kirakko A_RUNO  "hauras" ;
koisymbäriolii%<adj%>:koisymbärioli A_PAGIZII  "talon" ;
konkriettine%<adj%>:konkrietti A_NAINE  "konkreettinen" ;
kuivannuh%<adj%>:kuivannu A_TULLUH  "kuivunut" ;
kumei%<adj%>:kume A_VALGEI  "soinniton" ;
kuundelii%<adj%>:kuundeli A_PEZII  "kuuliainen" ;
kuurnis%<adj%>:kuurne A_KUURNIS  "kuuro" ;
kučuttu%<adj%>:kučuttu A_KOIVU  "kutsuttu" ;
lapsekas%<adj%>:lapsekka A_ARMAS  "jolla on lapsi" ;
liedžuju%<adj%>:liedžuja A_MUARJU  "notkuva" ;
lievy%<adj%>:lievä A_KOIRU  "lievä" ;
liikkui%<adj%>:liikku A_OSTAI  "liikkuva" ;
ložie%<adj%>:ložie A_HARDIE  "lihava" ;
meänkieline%<adj%>:meän#kieli A_KIELINE  "meänkielinen" ;
monenmoizet%<adj%>:monen#mo A_TOINE-PL  "monenmoiset" ;
muureh%<adj%>:muureh A_PEREH  "kuivettunut" ;
mygyri%<adj%>:mygyri A_ARTELI  "kupera" ;
nuorembi%<adj%>:nuoremb A_PAREMBI  "nuorempi" ;
näiviš%<adj%>:näive A_RAIŠ  "näivettynyt" ;
ohottu%<adj%>:ohotta A_AKKU  "innokas" ;
oma%<adj%>:oma A_OZA  "oma" ;
paha%<adj%>:paha A_KALA  "paha" ;
paranii%<adj%>:parani A_PEZII  "toipuva" ;
pieni%<adj%>:pien A_KIELI  "pieni" ;
pimiehkö%<adj%>:pimiehkö A_RUNO  "melko pimeä" ;
polletettu%<adj%>:polletettu A_KOIVU  "tallottu" ;
pättäy%<adj%>:pättä A_KESTÄY  "kelvollinen" ;
rakas%<adj%>:rakka A_ARMAS  "halukas" ;
ruadai%<adj%>:ruada A_OSTAI  "työtätekevä" ;
ruostunuh%<adj%>:ruostunu A_TULLUH  "ruostunut" ;
räkki%<adj%>:räkki A_HÄKKI  "helteinen" ;
sigei%<adj%>:sige A_VALGEI  "sikeä" ;
sinisilmäine%<adj%>:sinisilmä A_LIYGILÄINE  "sinisilmäinen (silmien väristä)" ;
sundo%<adj%>:sundo A_RUADO  "haalea" ;
suuri%<adj%>:suur A_SUARI  "iso" ;
syömäri%<adj%>:syömäri A_ARTELI  "ahne" ;
tahtaskieli%<adj%>:tahtas#kiel A_KIELI  "kankeakielinen" ;
talovuolline%<adj%>:talovuolli A_NAINE  "taloudellinen" ;
toine%<adj%>:to A_TOINE  "toinen" ;
toižen% suurut%<adj%>:toižen% suuru A_OLUT  "erisuuruinen" ;
torha%<adj%>:torha A_KOIRU  "suorapuheinen" ;
tozi%<adj%>:tod A_VUOZI  "tosi" ;
tulii%<adj%>:tuli A_KONDII  "tuleva" ;
tumeh%<adj%>:tumeh A_PEREH  "ummehtunut" ;
tuores%<adj%>:tuore A_TUORES  "tuore" ;
tyyni%<adj%>:tyyn A_NIMI  "tyyni" ;
täyzi%<adj%>:täyd A_VEZI  "täysi" ;
ubouuzi%<adj%>:ubo#uud A_VUOZI  "upouusi" ;
uinotussanaine%<adj%>:uinotussana A_KARJALAINE  "nukutusloru" ;
umbimärgy%<adj%>:umbi#märgä A_PÄIVY  "läpimärkä" ;
umbimärgä%<adj%>:umbi#märgä A_SÄYNÄ  "(yougi:) läpimärkä" ;
unohtettu%<adj%>:unohtettu A_KOIVU  "unohdettu" ;
urai%<adj%>:ura A_PIIRAI  "järjetön" ;
uskomattoman% suuri%<adj%>:uskomattoman% suur A_SUARI  "uskomattoman suuri" ;
valmis%<adj%>:valme A_KUURNIS  "valmis" ;
vara%<adj%>:vara A_KALA  "vara-" ;
varattau%<adj%>:varatta A_KESTÄY  "pelottava" ;
vastumieline%<adj%>:vastumieli A_KIELINE  "vastenmielinen" ;
veres%<adj%>:veres A_TUORES  "veres" ;
vihuandu%<adj%>:vihuanda A_MUARJU  "vihanta" ;
vikkelä%<adj%>:vikkelä A_OZA  "(yougi:) vilkas" ;
vino%<adj%>:vino A_RUNO  "vino" ;
viärätöi%<adj%>:viärät A_JIÄTÖI  "syytön" ;
yhtenjytyt%<adj%>:yhtenjytty A_OLUT  "(yougi:) yhtäpitävä" ;
yhtenkallehus%<adj%>:yhtenkallehu A_PUHTAHUS  "samanarvoinen" ;
yhtenmoine%<adj%>:yhten#mo A_TOINE  "samanlainen" ;
äimel%<adj%>:äimel A_MADAL  "äitelä" ;
šärgietty%<adj%>:šärgietty A_HERY  "särkynyt" ;
LEXICON A_NEWWORDS
gorʼatoi:gorʼat A_HUOLETOI "" ;
hämmästynnyh:hämmästynny A_PESSYH "" ;
kunnivoikas:kunnivoikka A_VARVAS "" ;
käzihheittymätöi:käzihheittymät A_JIÄTÖI "" ;
piindynyh:piindyny A_PESSYH "" ;
riijakas:riijakka A_VARVAS "" ;
sulasanaine:sulasana A_KARJALAINE "" ;
vuadimatoi:vuadimat A_HUOLETOI "" ;
ilmanigäine:ilmanigä A_LIYGILÄINE "" ;
nadʼožnoi:nadʼožnoi A_RAHMANNOI "" ;
srougoi:srougoi A_RAHMANNOI "" ;
LEXICON Exceptions
kuolla%<vblex%>%<act%>PrfPrc:kuolli A_KONDII ;
